dictsource/gu_rules
.group ં
        ં          n         // anusvara default

        // Labials -> m
        ં (પ       m
        ં (ફ       m
        ં (બ       m
        ં (ભ       m
        ં (મ       m
        ં (ફ઼      m

        // Retroflex -> n.
        ં (ટ       n.
        ં (ઠ       n.
        ં (ડ       n.
        ં (ઢ       n.
        ં (ણ       n.
        ં (ડ઼      n.
        ં (ઢ઼      n.

        // Palatals -> n^
        ં (ચ       n^
        ં (છ       n^
        ં (જ       n^
        ં (ઝ       n^
        ં (ઞ       n^
        ં (ય       n^
        ં (જ઼      n^

        // Velars -> N
        ં (ક       N
        ં (ખ       N
        ં (ગ       N
        ં (ઘ       N
        ં (ઙ       N
        ં (ક઼      N
        ં (ખ઼      N
        ં (ગ઼      N

        // Dentals -> n
        ં (ત       n
        ં (થ       n
        ં (દ       n
        ં (ધ       n
        ં (ન       n

.group ઃ
        ઃ          H         //  visarga

.group ્		// virama
્	k#'o:d.
C)	્ 

// Extra consonants

.group ક઼   // qa
        ક઼          qV
        ક઼ (_       q
        ક઼ (B       q

.group ખ઼   // khha
        ખ઼          xV
        ખ઼ (_       x
        ખ઼ (B       x

.group ગ઼    // ghha
        ગ઼          QV
        ગ઼ (_       Q
        ગ઼ (B       Q

.group જ઼    // za
        જ઼          zV
        જ઼ (_       z
        જ઼ (B       z

.group ફ઼    // fa
        ફ઼          fV
        ફ઼ (_       f
        ફ઼ (B       f

.group ૠ    // rr
        ૠ          V-rr

.group ૡ    // ll
        ૡ          l-:       // long syllabic l


// If we find a Latin letter a-z, then translate as English
// (This is now done automatically by the eSpeak program)

.group o
        o          _^_EN
   D__) of (__D    me




.group
        $          dOlV
        %          pVsEnt
